Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-34] Determination of policies
entitled to protection; notice to parties; lapse of policies for nonpayment of
premiums, etc. The insurance commissioner shall determine whether the
policy is entitled to protection under this part and shall notify the insured
and the insurer of that determination. Any policy found by the insurance
commissioner to be entitled to protection under this part, subsequent to date
of application and during the period of state military service of the insured
and for sixty days after the expiration of that service, shall not lapse or
otherwise terminate or be forfeited for the nonpayment of a premium becoming
due and payable, or the nonpayment of any indebtedness or interest. [L 1994, c
257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next